North Dakota statutes. TITLE 65 Workforce Safety and Insurance
CHAPTER 65-01 General Provisions
65-01-02.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

In this title:

“Acute care” means a short course of intensive diagnostic and therapeutic services provided immediately following a work injury with a rapid onset of pronounced symptoms.

“Adopted” or “adoption” refers only to a legal adoption effected prior to the time of the injury.

“Allied health care professional” includes a health care provider, pharmacist, audiologist, speech language pathologist, or naturopath or any recognized practitioner who provides skilled services pursuant to the prescription of, or under the supervision or direction of any of these individuals.

“Artificial members” includes a device that is a substitute for a natural part, organ, limb, or other part of the body. The term includes a prescriptive device that is an aid for a natural part, organ, limb, or other part of the body if the damage to the prescriptive device is accompanied by an injury to the body. A prescriptive device includes prescription eyeglasses, contact lenses, dental braces, and orthopedic braces.

“Artificial replacements” means mechanical aids, including braces, belts, casts, or crutches as may be reasonable and necessary due to compensable injury.

“Average weekly wage” means the weekly wages the injured employee was receiving from all employments for which coverage is required or otherwise secured at the date of first disability. The average weekly wage determined under this subsection must be rounded to the nearest dollar. If the injured employee’s wages are not fixed by the week, they must be determined by using the first applicable formula from the schedule below:

For seasonal employment, during the first consecutive days of disability up to twenty-eight days the average weekly wage is calculated pursuant to the first applicable formula in subdivisions b through g, and after that are calculated as one-fiftieth of the total wages from all occupations during the twelve months preceding the date of first disability or during the tax year preceding the date of first disability, or an average of the three tax years preceding the date of first disability, whichever is highest and for which accurate, reliable, and complete records are readily available.

The “average weekly wage” of a self-employed employer is determined by the following formula: one fifty-second of the average annual net self-employed earnings reported the three preceding tax years or preceding fifty-two weeks whichever is higher if accurate, reliable, and complete records for those fifty-two weeks are readily available.

Hourly or daily rate multiplied by number of hours or days worked per seven-day week.

Monthly rate multiplied by twelve months and divided by fifty-two weeks.

Biweekly rate divided by two.

The usual wage paid other employees engaged in similar occupations.

A wage reasonably and fairly approximating the weekly wage lost by the injured employee during the period of disability.

“Average weekly wage in the state” means the determination made of the average weekly wage in the state by job service North Dakota on or before July first of each year, computed to the next highest dollar.

“Board” means the workforce safety and insurance board of directors.

“Brother” and “sister” include a stepbrother and a stepsister, a half brother and a half sister, and a brother and sister by adoption. The terms do not include a married brother or sister unless that person actually is dependent.

“Child”, for determining eligibility for benefits under chapter 65-05, means a legitimate child, a stepchild, adopted child, posthumous child, foster child, and acknowledged illegitimate child who is under eighteen years of age and resides with the injured employee; or is under eighteen years of age and does not reside with the injured employee but a duty of support is substantiated by an appropriate court order; or is between eighteen and twenty-two years of age and enrolled as a full-time student in any accredited educational institution and dependent upon the injured employee for support; or is eighteen years of age or over and is physically or mentally incapable of self-support and is actually dependent upon the injured employee for support. A child does not include a married child unless actually dependent on the injured employee as shown on the preceding year’s income tax returns.

“Compensable injury” means an injury by accident arising out of and in the course of hazardous employment which must be established by medical evidence supported by objective medical findings.

The term includes:

Disease caused by a hazard to which an employee is subjected in the course of employment. The disease must be incidental to the character of the business and not independent of the relation of employer and employee. Disease includes effects from radiation.

An injury to artificial members.

Injuries due to heart attack or other heart-related disease, stroke, and physical injury caused by mental stimulus, but only when caused by the employee’s employment with reasonable medical certainty, and only when it is determined with reasonable medical certainty that unusual stress is at least fifty percent of the cause of the injury or disease as compared with all other contributing causes combined. Unusual stress means stress greater than the highest level of stress normally experienced or anticipated in that position or line of work.

Injuries arising out of employer-required or supplied travel to and from a remote jobsite or activities performed at the direction or under the control of the employer.

An injury caused by the willful act of a third person directed against an employee because of the employee’s employment.

A mental or psychological condition caused by a physical injury, but only when the physical injury is determined with reasonable medical certainty to be at least fifty percent of the cause of the condition as compared with all other contributing causes combined, and only when the condition did not pre-exist the work injury.

The term does not include:

Ordinary diseases of life to which the general public outside of employment is exposed or preventive treatment for communicable diseases, except that the organization may pay for preventive treatment for a health care provider as defined in section 23-07.5-01, firefighter, peace officer, correctional officer, court officer, law enforcement officer, emergency medical technician, or an individual trained and authorized by law or rule to render emergency medical assistance or treatment that is exposed to a bloodborne pathogen as defined in section 23-07.5-01 occurring in the course of employment and for exposure to rabies occurring in the course of employment.

A willfully self-inflicted injury, including suicide or attempted suicide, or an injury caused by the employee’s willful intention to injure or kill another.

Any injury caused by the use of intoxicants, including recreational marijuana use, or the illegal use of controlled substances.

An injury that arises out of an altercation in which the injured employee is an aggressor. This paragraph does not apply to public safety employees, including law enforcement officers or private security personnel who are required to engage in altercations as part of their job duties if the altercation arises out of the performance of those job duties.

An injury that arises out of an illegal act committed by the injured employee.

An injury that arises out of an employee’s voluntary nonpaid participation in any recreational activity, including athletic events, parties, and picnics, even though the employer pays some or all of the cost of the activity.

Injuries attributable to a pre-existing injury, disease, or other condition, including when the employment acts as a trigger to produce symptoms in the pre-existing injury, disease, or other condition unless the employment substantially accelerates its progression or substantially worsens its severity. Pain is a symptom and may be considered in determining whether there is a substantial acceleration or substantial worsening of a pre-existing injury, disease, or other condition, but pain alone is not a substantial acceleration or a substantial worsening.

A nonemployment injury that, although acting upon a prior compensable injury, is an independent intervening cause of injury.

A latent or asymptomatic degenerative condition, caused in substantial part by employment duties, which is triggered or made active by a subsequent injury.

A mental injury arising from mental stimulus.

“Date of first disability” means the first date the injured employee was unable to work because of a compensable injury.

“Date of maximum medical improvement” or “date of maximum medical recovery” means the date after which further recovery from, or lasting improvement to, an injury or disease can no longer reasonably be anticipated based upon reasonable medical probability.

“Director” means the director of the organization.

“Disability” means loss of earnings capacity and may be permanent total, temporary total, or partial.

“Employee” means an individual who performs hazardous employment for another for remuneration unless the individual is an independent contractor under the common-law test.

The term includes:

All elective and appointed officials of this state and its political subdivisions, including municipal corporations and including the members of the legislative assembly, all elective officials of any county, and all elective peace officers of any city.

Aliens.

Human service zone general assistance workers, except those who are engaged in repaying to human service zones or the department of health and human services moneys the human service zones or the department of health and human services have been compelled by statute to expend for general assistance.

Minors, whether lawfully or unlawfully employed. A minor is deemed sui juris for the purposes of this title, and no other person has any claim for relief or right to claim workforce safety and insurance benefits for any injury to a minor worker, but in the event of the award of a lump sum of benefits to a minor employee, the lump sum may be paid only to the legally appointed guardian of the minor.

The term does not include:

An individual whose employment is both casual and not in the course of the trade, business, profession, or occupation of that individual’s employer.

An individual who is engaged in an illegal enterprise or occupation.

The spouse of an employer or the child under the age of twenty-two of an employer. For purposes of this paragraph and section 65-07-01, “child” means any legitimate child, stepchild, adopted child, foster child, or acknowledged illegitimate child.

A real estate broker or real estate salesperson, provided the individual meets the following three requirements:

The salesperson or broker must be a licensed real estate agent under section 43-23-05.

Substantially all of the salesperson’s or broker’s remuneration for the services performed as a real estate agent must be directly related to sales or other efforts rather than to the number of hours worked.

A written agreement must exist between the salesperson or broker and the person for which the salesperson or broker works, which agreement must provide the salesperson or broker will not be treated as an employee but rather as an independent contractor.

The members of the board of directors of a business corporation who are not employed in any capacity by the corporation other than as members of the board of directors.

An individual delivering newspapers or shopping news, if substantially all of the individual’s remuneration is directly related to sales or other efforts rather than to the number of hours worked and a written agreement exists between the individual and the publisher of the newspaper or shopping news which states the individual is an independent contractor.

An employer.

“Employer” means a person that engages or received the services of another for remuneration unless the person performing the services is an independent contractor under the common-law test. The term includes:

The state and all political subdivisions thereof.

All public and quasi-public corporations in this state.

Every person, partnership, limited liability company, association, and private corporation, including a public service corporation.

The legal representative of any deceased employer.

The receiver or trustee of any person, partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation having one or more employees as herein defined.

The president, vice presidents, secretary, or treasurer of a business corporation, but not members of the board of directors of a business corporation who are not also officers of the corporation.

The managers of a limited liability company.

The president, vice presidents, secretary, treasurer, or board of directors of an association or cooperative organized under chapter 6-06, 10-12, 10-13, 10-15, 36-08, or 49-21.

The clerk, assessor, treasurer, or any member of the board of supervisors of an organized township, if the person is not employed by the township in any other capacity.

A multidistrict special education unit.

An area career and technology center.

A regional education association.

“Fee schedule” means the payment formulas established in the organization publication entitled “Medical and Hospital Fees”.

“Fund” means the workforce safety and insurance fund.

“Hazardous employment” means any employment in which one or more employees are employed regularly in the same business or in or about the establishment except:

Agricultural or domestic service.

Any employment of a common carrier by railroad.

Any employment for the transportation of property or persons by nonresidents, where, in such transportation, the highways are not traveled more than seven miles [11.27 kilometers] and return over the same route within the state of North Dakota.

All members of the clergy and employees of religious organizations engaged in the operation, maintenance, and conduct of the place of worship.

“Health care provider” means a doctor of medicine or osteopathy, chiropractor, dentist, optometrist, podiatrist, or psychologist acting within the scope of the doctor’s license, a physical therapist, an advanced practice registered nurse, or a certified physician assistant.

“Medical marijuana” means the use of all parts of the plant of the genus cannabis, the seeds of the plant, the resin extracted from any part of the plant, and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, the seeds of the plant, or the resin extracted from any part of the plant as a physician-recommended form of medicine or herbal therapy. The term does not include treatments or preparations specifically approved by the United States food and drug administration as a drug product.

“Noncompliance” means failure to follow the requirements of chapter 65-04. An employer may be in noncompliance regardless of the employer’s insured or uninsured status with the organization.

“Organization” means workforce safety and insurance, or the director, or any department head, assistant, or employee of workforce safety and insurance designated by the director, to act within the course and scope of that person’s employment in administering the policies, powers, and duties of this title.

“Parent” includes a stepparent and a parent by adoption.

“Payroll report” means the mechanism created by the organization and used by employers to report all employee payroll required by the organization.

“Permanent impairment” means the loss of or loss of use of a member of the body existing after the date of maximum medical improvement and includes disfigurement resulting from an injury.

“Permanent total disability” means disability that is the direct result of a compensable injury that prevents an injured employee from performing any work and results from any one of the following conditions:

Total and permanent loss of sight of both eyes;

Loss of both legs or loss of both feet at or above the ankle;

Loss of both arms or loss of both hands at or above the wrist;

Loss of any two of the members or faculties in subdivision a, b, or c;

Permanent and complete paralysis of both legs or both arms or of one leg and one arm;

Third-degree burns that cover at least forty percent of the body and require grafting;

A medically documented brain injury affecting cognitive and mental functioning which renders an injured employee unable to provide self-care and requires supervision or assistance with a majority of the activities of daily living; or

A compensable injury that results in a permanent partial impairment rating of the whole body of at least twenty-five percent pursuant to section 65-05-12.2.

“Rehabilitation services” means nonmedical services reasonably necessary to restore a disabled employee to substantial gainful employment as defined by section 65-05.1-01 as near as possible. The term may include vocational evaluation, counseling, education, workplace modification, vocational retraining including training for alternative employment with the same employer, and job placement assistance.

“Seasonal employment” includes occupations that are not permanent or that do not customarily operate throughout the entire year. Seasonal employment is determined by what is customary with respect to the employer at the time of injury.

“Spouse” includes only the decedent’s husband or wife who was living with the decedent or was dependent upon the decedent for support at the time of injury.

“Subcontractor” means a person that agrees to perform all or part of the work for a contractor or another subcontractor.

“Temporary total disability” means disability that results in the inability of an injured employee to earn wages as a result of a compensable injury for which disability benefits may not exceed a cumulative total of one hundred four weeks or the date the injured employee reaches maximum medical improvement or maximum medical recovery, whichever occurs first.

“Uninsured” means failure of an employer to secure mandatory coverage with the organization or failure to pay premium, assessment, penalty, or interest, as calculated by the organization, which is more than forty-five days past due. An uninsured employer is subject to chapter 65-09.

“Utilization review” means the initial and continuing evaluation of appropriateness in terms of both the level and the quality of health care and health services provided a patient, based on medically accepted standards. The evaluation must be accomplished by means of a system that identifies the utilization of medical services, based on medically accepted standards, and which refers instances of possible inappropriate utilization to the organization to obtain opinions and recommendations of expert medical consultants to review individual cases for which administrative action may be deemed necessary.

“Valid functional capacities examination” means:

The results of a physical examination consisting of a battery of standardized assessments that offer reliable results in performance-based measures and demonstrate the level and duration an injured employee may return to work.

The conclusions of medical experts, following observations of other activities the medical expert determines similarly predictive, when the results of the physical examination in subdivision a are not obtained or reliable.

“Wages” means:

An injured employee’s remuneration from all employment reportable to the internal revenue service as earned income for federal income tax purposes.

For members of the national guard who sustain a compensable injury while on state active duty, “wages” includes income from federal employment and may be included in determining the average weekly wage.

For purposes of chapter 65-04 only, “wages” means all gross earnings of all employees. The term includes all pretax deductions for amounts allocated by the employee for deferred compensation, medical reimbursement, retirement, or any similar program, but may not include dismissal or severance pay.

The organization may consider postinjury wages for which coverage was not required or otherwise secured in North Dakota for purposes of determining appropriate vocational rehabilitation options or entitlement to disability benefits under this title.

If the injured employee has not reached maximum medical improvement within one hundred four weeks, the injured employee may receive a permanent partial impairment rating if a rating will assist the organization in assessing the injured employee’s capabilities. Entitlement to a rating is solely within the discretion of the organization.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 2; 1921, ch. 142, § 1; 1925, ch. 222, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a2; S.L. 1935, ch. 286, § 1; 1941, ch. 303, § 1; 1941, ch. 305, § 1; 1943, ch. 274, §§ 1, 13; R.C. 1943, § 65-0102; S.L. 1945, ch. 337, § 1; 1947, ch. 375, § 1; 1949, ch. 354, § 1; 1951, ch. 341, § 1; 1955, ch. 354, § 6; 1957, ch. 390, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 65-0102; S.L. 1961, ch. 388, § 1; 1965, ch. 451, § 1; 1967, ch. 483, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 558, § 1; 1971, ch. 597, § 1; 1971, ch. 598, § 1; 1975, ch. 579, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 579, § 2; 1981, ch. 639, § 1; 1981, ch. 640, § 1; 1983, ch. 695, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 82, § 159; 1985, ch. 685, §§ 1, 2; 1987, ch. 298, § 3; 1987, ch. 750, § 1; 1989, ch. 69, § 74; 1989, ch. 295, § 4; 1989, ch. 765, § 1; 1991, ch. 54, § 30; 1991, ch. 713, § 1; 1991, ch. 714, § 23; 1993, ch. 45, § 22; 1993, ch. 54, § 105; 1993, ch. 613, §§ 1, 5; 1993, ch. 614, §§ 1, to 3; 1993, ch. 615, § 1; 1993, ch. 616, § 1; 1993, ch. 617, § 1; 1995, ch. 456, § 24; 1995, ch. 606, § 1; 1995, ch. 607, § 1; 1995, ch. 608, § 1; 1995, ch. 609, § 1; 1995, ch. 610, § 1; 1997, ch. 527, § 1; 1997, ch. 528, § 1; 1997, ch. 530, § 1; 1999, ch. 550, § 1; 1999, ch. 551, § 1; 2001, ch. 574, § 1; 2001, ch. 575, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, §§ 1, 3; 2003, ch. 562, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 235, § 6; 2005, ch. 610, § 1; 2005, ch. 611, § 1; 2009, ch. 163, § 4; 2009, ch. 607, § 1; 2009, ch. 608, § 1; 2013, ch. 498, § 1; 2013, ch. 499, § 1; 2015, ch. 334, § 11, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 480, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 434, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 438, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 137, effective January 1, 2020; 2019, ch. 523, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 524, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 525, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 500, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 501, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 508, effective September 1, 2022.

65-01-03.
Individual performing service for remuneration presumed an employee.

Each individual who performs services for another for remuneration is presumed to be an employee of the person for which the services are performed, unless it is proven that the individual is an independent contractor under the common-law test. The person that asserts that an individual is an independent contractor under the common-law test, rather than an employee, has the burden of proving that fact.

In the case of commercial motor vehicles whose gross vehicle weight rating is more than twenty-six thousand pounds [11793.40 kilograms], with an individual operating a licensed truck or licensed tractor for a motor carrier of property, the presumption in subsection 1 is successfully rebutted if all of the following factors are present:

The individual owns, leases, or enters a purchase agreement to purchase a truck or tractor. The lease or purchase agreement must represent reasonably the value of the lease or purchase of the truck or tractor. The lease or purchase agreement may be with the carrier of property. An unreasonable lease or purchase agreement with a third party, unaffiliated with the carrier, does not affect this factor.

The individual is responsible for the maintenance and repair of the truck or tractor.

The individual bears the principal burden of operating costs, including fuel, supplies, vehicle insurance, and personal expenses.

The individual is responsible for supplying the necessary personal services to operate the truck or tractor.

Income taxes are not withheld from the individual’s compensation.

The individual generally determines the details and means of performing the services, in conformance with statutory or regulatory requirements, operating procedures of the carrier, and specifications of the shipper.

The individual enters a written agreement with the motor carrier outlining the nature of the relationship.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 305, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0103; S.L. 1947, ch. 375, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 65-0103; S.L. 1977, ch. 579, § 3; 1991, ch. 533, § 3; 1993, ch. 347, § 4; 1997, ch. 527, § 2; 2009, ch. 609, § 1.

65-01-04.
Computation of weekly wages in compensation matters. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 558, § 6.

Collateral References.

Workers’
Compensation: Value of Employer-Provided Room, Board, or Clothing as Factor in Determining Basis for or Calculation of Amount of Compensation Under State Workers’
Compensation Statute. 48 A.L.R.6th 387.

65-01-05.
Employment of those unprotected by insurance unlawful — Effect of failure to secure compensation — Penalty — Injunction. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 578, § 17.

65-01-06.
Exempting certain flying employees.

Pilots, copilots, stewardesses, and other regular flying employees of a regularly established airline operating under a certificate of convenience and necessity granted by the competent authorities of the United States of America and operating regularly scheduled flights in interstate or foreign commerce shall be exempt from the compulsory provisions of this title while engaged in work, the duties of which primarily involve interstate or foreign flying operations. Employees not regularly engaged in interstate or foreign flying operations, and the flying employees of any such airline as has its principal operating base in North Dakota, shall not be included in this exemption.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 304, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0106.

65-01-07.
Employer must keep record of injuries to employees — Reports required — Contents — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

65-01-08.
Contributing employer and staffing service relieved from liability for injury to employee.

If a local or out-of-state employer secured the payment of compensation to that employer’s employees by contributing premiums to the fund, the employee, and the parents in the case of a minor employee, or the representatives or beneficiaries of either, do not have a claim for relief against the contributing employer or against any agent, servant, or other employee of the employer for damages for personal injuries, but shall look solely to the fund for compensation.

If a client company contracts with a staffing service for an employee’s services, the client company and the staffing service are immune from any claim for relief by that employee or by another employee of the client company or staffing service, to the same extent granted under this title to contributing employers if the client company or staffing service secured the payment of compensation in accordance with this title. Although an account must include the name of the staffing service, the employee is considered an employee of the client company and staffing service for purposes of application of immunity for injuries incurred by or caused by that employee.

For purposes of this section:

“Client company” means a person that contracts to receive services within the course of that person’s usual business from a staffing service or that contracts to lease any or all of that person’s employees from a staffing service.

“Staffing service” means an employer in the business of providing the employer’s employees to persons to perform services within the course of that person’s usual businesses. The term includes professional employer organizations’ staff leasing companies, employee leasing organizations, and temporary staffing companies. The term “staffing service” must be broadly construed to encompass entities that offer services provided by a professional employer organization, staff leasing company, employee leasing organization, or temporary staffing company regardless of the term used.

Within the meaning of staffing service as used in this section, “temporary staffing” or “temporary staffing service” means an arrangement by which an employer hires its own employees and assigns the employees to a client company to support or supplement the client company’s workforce in a special work situation, including:

An employee absence;

A temporary skill shortage;

A seasonal workload; or

A special assignment or project with a targeted end date.

The term does not include arrangements in which the majority of the client company’s workforce has been assigned by a temporary staffing service for a period of more than twelve consecutive months.

A staffing service that provides only temporary staffing services is the employee’s employer. The temporary staffing service shall maintain a workforce safety and insurance account in the temporary staffing service’s name and report the wages for those workers annually to the organization. All other staffing services shall:

Report payroll detail as directed by the organization for each North Dakota client company.

Maintain complete and separate records of the payroll of the staffing service’s client companies. Claims must be separately identified by the staffing service for each client company.

Share employer responsibilities with the client company, including retention of the authority to hire, terminate, discipline, and reassign employees. If the contractual agreement between a staffing service and a client company is terminated, the employees become the sole employees of the client company.

Notify the organization of the client company’s name, workforce safety and insurance account number, and the date the staffing service began providing services to the client company. The staffing service shall provide this information upon entering an agreement with a client company, but no later than fifteen days from the effective date of the written agreement.

Supply the organization with a copy of the agreement between the staffing service and client company.

Notify the organization upon termination of any agreement with a client company, but no later than fifteen days from the effective date of termination.

Notify the staffing service’s client companies of an uninsured status for failure to pay workforce safety and insurance premiums within fifteen days of notice by the organization.

A staffing service that provides both temporary and long-term employees is subject to the reporting requirements associated with the type of employee provided to the client company.

The organization shall maintain all employer data for each client company requiring coverage under this title. If a client company enters an agreement with a staffing service, the organization shall generate a master billing for the staffing service detailing the staffing service’s client companies.

Rate classifications for employees provided by a staffing service must be those which would apply as if the work were performed by the employees of the client company. A client company is eligible for organization safety discount and dividend programs. If a client company enters an agreement with a staffing service, the client company shall retain the client company’s experience rate, if applicable.

Both a staffing service and client company under this section are considered employers for purposes of section 65-04-26.1. A staffing service that provides employees to a client company that has been determined to be uninsured or ineligible for coverage under sections 65-04-27.1 and 65-04-33 may not secure workforce safety and insurance coverage for those employees.

The organization shall determine whether an entity is a staffing service. If the organization determines an entity is a staffing service, the organization may further determine if the entity is a temporary staffing service. In rendering either determination, the organization may issue a decision under section 65-04-32. If the organization determines an entity is not a staffing service, the client company shall maintain a workforce safety and insurance account and pay the premium for coverage of the employees.

The factors the organization may consider in determining whether an entity is a staffing service include the number of client companies handled by the staffing service, the length of time the staffing service has been in existence, the extent to which the staffing service extends services to the general public, the degree to which the client company and staffing service are separate and unrelated business entities, the repetition of officers or managers between the client company and staffing service, and the extent to which a client company has an ownership or other interest in the staffing service. The organization also may consider the scope of the services provided by the staffing service, the relationship between the staffing service and the client company’s workers, the written agreement between the staffing service and the client company, and any other factor deemed relevant by the organization.

The organization may require information from any staffing service, including a list of current client company accounts, staffing assignments, payroll information, and rate classification information. A client company shall provide any information requested by the organization regarding any staffing service.

The organization may adopt rules consistent with this section which further define client company and staffing service and which provide a procedure by which the organization may determine whether an entity meets these definitions.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 6; 1925 Supp., § 396a6; R.C. 1943, § 65-0108; S.L. 1951, ch. 342, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 65-0108; S.L. 1985, ch. 82, § 160; 1999, ch. 552, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 563, § 1; 2019, ch. 524, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Word defined by statute always has same meaning, see N.D.C.C. § 1-01-09.